Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 5. SANITATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

SUBTITLE A. SANITATION

CHAPTER 344. MOSQUITO CONTROL DISTRICTS

Sec. 344.001. ELECTION ON ESTABLISHMENT AND TAX LEVY. The county judge on being petitioned by at least 200 qualified voters of the county may order an election to determine if the qualified voters of the county desire the:

(1) establishment of a mosquito control district in all or a portion of the county for the purpose of eradicating mosquitoes in the area; and

(2) levy of a tax not to exceed 25 cents on each $100 of the taxable value of property taxable by the district to finance the program provided by this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 344.002. BALLOT PROPOSITIONS. The ballot for an election under this chapter shall be printed to provide for voting for or against the propositions:

(1) "The establishment of a mosquito control district in ____________ County."; and

(2) "The levy of a tax of ______ cents on each $100 of the taxable value of property taxable by the district to finance the mosquito control district within ____________ County."

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 344.003. LEVY AND COLLECTION OF TAX. (a) If the election results are in favor of the establishment of a mosquito control district and the levy of a tax, the commissioners court may levy a tax not to exceed the amount fixed by the election.

(b) The commissioners court may lower the tax to any designated sum it may determine if the anticipated revenue exceeds the revenue needed to carry out this chapter.

(c) The taxes levied under this section shall be:

(1) collected by the county tax assessor-collector;

(2) deposited in a separate fund; and

(3) used only to carry out this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 344.004. ADVISORY COMMISSION. (a) The commissioners court in each county in which a mosquito control district is established shall appoint an advisory commission composed of five members who are qualified property taxpaying voters of the county. The commissioners of the commissioners court and the county judge shall each appoint one member of the advisory commission.

(b) Members of the advisory commission serve without compensation.

(c) The advisory commission shall make recommendations to the commissioners court that it considers necessary to carry out this chapter and shall perform any other duties as the commissioners court may determine.

(d) Each advisory commission member must take an oath of office prescribed by the commissioners court. The commissioners court may remove any member of the advisory commission at any time it considers necessary.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 344.005. MOSQUITO CONTROL ENGINEER. (a) The commissioners court in each county that has established a mosquito control district may appoint a mosquito control engineer who must be well qualified in the field of mosquito control. The mosquito control engineer serves at a salary determined by the commissioners court.

(b) The commissioners court shall supervise the powers and duties of the engineer.

(c) The engineer shall make recommendations to the commissioners court relating to the number of assistants and employees that may be needed, and the commissioners court shall appoint the assistants and employees it considers necessary for mosquito eradication in the district.

(d) The engineer shall make semiannual reports to the commissioners court or as many reports as are requested by the court concerning the work of mosquito eradication and of the expenses needed for the ensuing year.

(e) The first report shall be made not later than June 30 following the establishment of the mosquito control district, and the second report shall be made not later than December 31 following the first report.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 344.006. MERGER OF DISTRICTS. (a) The commissioners courts of two or more counties operating under this chapter may enter into an agreement to merge their separate districts into a single mosquito control district composed of those counties.

(b) The commissioners courts shall enter into an agreement that complies with this chapter, except that the advisory commission and mosquito control engineer may be appointed for the entire district rather than for each county.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 344.007. ELECTION ON DISSOLUTION OF DISTRICT. Each commissioners court that has established a mosquito control district under this chapter shall order an election to dissolve the mosquito control district on a petition of not less than 10 percent of the qualified voters of the county, as determined by the number of votes cast for all candidates for governor in the most recent gubernatorial general election.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.